Idaho, session 2025, H0361.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. The Legislature recognizes the signifi-
cant and rapid population growth in the State of Idaho that has occurred for
more than a decade and the corresponding increase of residential develop-
ments and homeowner's associations. The Legislature finds and declares that
this legislation is necessary to protect the property rights, reasonable ex-
pectations, and welfare of the citizens and residents of this state who own
property and are members of homeowner's associations.
SECTION 2. That Section 55-3203, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
55-3203. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Board" means the entity that has the duty of governing the home-
owner's association and may be referred to as a board of directors, executive
board, or any other such similar name.
(2) "Community manager" means a person or agent who provides for or oth-
erwise engages in the management of a common interest community or the man-
agement of a homeowner's association.
(3) "Declarant" means an individual or entity filing a declaration in
association with a residential subdivision.
(4) "Declaration" means an instrument filed in the real property
records of a county that includes restrictive covenants governing a residen-
tial subdivision.
(3) (5) "Financial disclosure" means the accounting records of the or-
ganization that are kept, disclosed, and made available for inspection in
accordance with part 11, chapter 30, title 30, Idaho Code, and the governing
documents of the homeowner's association.
(4) (6) "Governing documents" means a written instrument by which the
homeowner's association may exercise powers or manage, maintain, or other-
wise affect the property under the jurisdiction of the homeowner's associa-
tion. Governing documents includes but is not limited to articles of incor-


poration, bylaws, a plat, rules of the homeowner's association, and any dec-
laration of covenants, conditions, and restrictions.
(5) (7)(a) "Homeowner's association" means any incorporated or unin-
corporated residential association:
(i) In which membership is based on owning or possessing an inter-
est in real property; and
(ii) That has the authority, pursuant to recorded covenants, by-
laws, or other governing documents, to assess and record liens
against the real property of its members.
(b) "Homeowner's association" includes the following persons who may
or may not be members of a homeowner's association or serve on the board
of a homeowner's association:
(i) A community manager pursuant to a contract with a homeowner's
association; and
(ii) An agent or person with explicit or apparent authority to act
on behalf of a homeowner's association.
(6) (8) "Member" or "membership" means any person or entity owning or
possessing an interest in residential real property or a lot within the phys-
ical boundaries of an established homeowner's association.
(9) "Owner" means a person who holds record title to property in a resi-
dential subdivision and includes an agent of a person who holds record title
to property in a residential subdivision.
(6) (10) "Transfer fee" means a fee, charge, or assessment, as that term
is described in chapter 31, title 55, Idaho Code, charged by the homeowner's
association and payable to the homeowner's association upon the transfer
of an interest in real property that is under the jurisdiction of the home-
owner's association.
SECTION 3. That Chapter 32, Title 55, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 55-3204A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
55-3204A. HOMEOWNER'S ASSOCIATIONS -- POWERS -- DUTIES -- ENFORCE-
MENT. For any homeowner's association formed after July 1, 2025, the follow-
ing provisions shall apply:
(1)(a) The governing documents may provide for a period of declarant
control of the homeowner's association, during which a declarant, or
persons designated by the declarant, may appoint and remove board mem-
bers and officers of the homeowner's association. If the governing
documents permit owner election of board members or officers during the
period of declarant control, such board members or officers elected by
owners may not be removed by the declarant.
(b) Regardless of the period of declarant control provided by the gov-
erning documents, on or before one hundred eighty (180) days after the
date on which seventy-five percent (75%) of the lots are conveyed to
owners other than the declarant or a builder in the business of con-
structing homes that purchased the lots from the declarant for the
purpose of selling completed homes built on the lots, at least one-third
(1/3) of the positions on the homeowner's association board shall be
offered for members elected by owners other than the declarant.


(c) Once ninety-five percent (95%) of a development is built and occu-
pied, the declarant shall begin the process of turning over full con-
trol of the homeowner's association to the owners and shall complete the
process within twelve (12) months of such date.
(2) The provisions in subsection (1) of this section shall apply to the
transfer of board control and do not affect other declarant rights as set
forth in the declaration. The declarant shall retain architectural review
authority during the period of declarant control, except as otherwise speci-
fied in the declaration.
(3) If a declarant fails or refuses to comply with subsection (1) of
this section, an adversely affected owner may seek injunctive relief to re-
quire compliance within thirty (30) days of sending a written notice to the
declarant.
SECTION 4. That Chapter 32, Title 55, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 55-3204B, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
55-3204B. RESTRICTIONS ON BOARD MEMBERSHIP -- PROXY VOTES. (1) Except
during the period of declarant control of the homeowner's association pur-
suant to section 55-3204A, Idaho Code, only one (1) owner per lot shall serve
concurrently on the board of a homeowner's association.
(2) Votes allocated to the owners may be cast under a written proxy duly
executed by the owner, pursuant to the provisions of the Idaho nonprofit cor-
poration act under part 5, chapter 30, title 30, Idaho Code, except:
(a) No single owner may hold proxies representing more than fifty per-
cent (50%) of the total votes in the homeowner's association; and
(b) A person may not serve on the board of a homeowner's association if
the person is a member of the same household in the same primary resi-
dence as another board member of the homeowner's association.
(3) The provisions of subsection (2) of this section shall not apply to
a homeowner's association with fewer than twenty (20) residences or during
the declarant control period of the homeowner's association.
SECTION 5. That Section 55-3205, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
55-3205. DISCLOSURE OF FEES AND FINANCIAL DISCLOSURES. (1) A home-
owner's association or its agent must shall provide a member and the member's
agent, if any, a statement of the member's assessment account no more than
five (5) business days after a written request by the member or the member's
agent is received by the manager, president, board member, or other agent of
the homeowner's association, or any combination thereof. The homeowner's
association will be bound by the amounts set forth within the statement of
assessment account. The statement of assessment account shall include all
outstanding assessments, charges, and fees, including any transfer fee,
that are due and owing to the homeowner's association, including any late
fees or interest that may have accrued. Additionally, the homeowner's asso-
ciation shall provide the amount of any transfer fee that may be charged upon
a transfer of the property. No fee may shall be charged by a homeowner's as-
sociation or its agent for providing a statement of the member's assessment


account. Charging a fee for any statement of the member's assessment account
required by this section is a violation of the Idaho consumer protection act,
chapter 6, title 48, Idaho Code.
(2) A homeowner's association may shall not charge a transfer fee
unless the authority to do so is expressly stated in the declaration of
covenants, conditions, and restrictions. The transfer fee may shall be
charged only by the homeowner's association, and no portion of the transfer
fee may be paid to or allocated to a third party, including any board member
or the homeowner's association's agent or manager. On or before January 1
of each year, a homeowner's association or its agent must shall provide its
members a disclosure of fees that will be charged to a member. Fees imposed
by a homeowner's association for the calendar year following the disclosure
of fees may shall not exceed the amount set forth on the annual disclosure,
and no surcharge or additional fees may shall be charged to any member in
connection with any transfer of ownership of his property.
(3) A homeowner's association or its agent must shall provide a member
and the member's agent, if any, an up-to-date updated financial disclosure
no more than ten (10) business days after a request by the member or the mem-
ber's agent is received by the manager, president, board member, or other
agent of the homeowner's association, or any combination thereof.
(4) Within sixty (60) days of the close of the fiscal year, a home-
owner's association or its agent must shall provide all members of the
organization, and each member's agent, if any, with an up-to-date updated
and reconciled financial disclosure for the fiscal year.
(5) Except as otherwise provided in this section, each homeowner's as-
sociation shall be subject to the records and reports requirements of the
Idaho nonprofit corporation act under part 11, chapter 30, title 30, Idaho
Code.
SECTION 6. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.